New York, session 2025-2026, A7993.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The director of the authorities budget office shall conduct 2 a comprehensive study analyzing the financial impact on local govern- 3 ments being responsible for the upkeep in public areas immediately 4 outside of properties owned or leased by public authorities, including 5 but not limited to, sidewalks. 6 § 2. For the purposes of this act, the director of the authorities 7 budget office may conduct such study in conjunction with any other 8 department, division, board, bureau, commission, agency, public authori- 9 ty, local government or municipality of the state deemed necessary. To 10 the maximum extent feasible, such director shall be authorized to 11 request, receive, and utilize such resources and data of any other 12 department, division, board, bureau, commission, agency, public authori- 13 ty, local government or municipality of the state as such director may 14 reasonably request to properly carry their powers and duties pursuant to 15 this act. 16 § 3. The director of the authorities budget office shall publish such 17 report to the governor, the temporary president of the senate, the 18 speaker of the assembly, the chair of the senate committee on labor and 19 the chair of the assembly committee on labor no later than December 31, 20 2025. 21 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 22 deemed repealed January 1, 2026. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09378-01-5